Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
Article 4 Placement, Transfer, and Transportation of
Patients Generally

37-3-100.
Placement and transfer of patients generally.

The department may designate the state owned or state operated facility to which a patient is to be admitted under this chapter. The department may instead designate a private facility, approved under Code Section 37-3-6, to which the patient is to be
admitted, if the department has obtained the prior agreement of the private facility and of the patient or his representatives.

A patient hospitalized in a state owned or state operated facility under this chapter may apply for transfer at his own expense to a private facility approved under Code Section 37-3-6 if he is able to pay for treatment at such private facility. If the
private facility agrees to accept the patient, the department shall transfer the patient to that facility.

If a private facility requests the department to take custody of a patient who has been hospitalized therein under this chapter and if the patient meets the criteria for admission under this chapter, then the department shall accept the patient and designate
the state owned or state operated facility to which the patient shall be admitted.

When the needs of the patient or efficient utilization of any facility so requires, a patient may be transferred from one facility to another. At the time of any such transfer, notice shall be given in writing to the patient and to his representatives
and the patient shall be advised in writing of the reasons for his transfer. A voluntary patient may be transferred only with his consent.

A patient hospitalized in a private facility, approved under Code Section 37-3-6, or that patient’s representative may request that facility to transfer the patient to a state owned or operated facility. That private facility shall then request the department
to take custody of the patient. If the patient meets the criteria for admission under this chapter, then the private facility shall transfer the patient and the department shall accept the patient and designate the state owned
or operated facility to which the patient shall be admitted.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 10; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 10; Code 1933, § 88-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 88-502.13, 88-508.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 88-507.5, 88-502.16, enacted
by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 873, § 1.

37-3-101.
Transportation of patients generally.

The governing authority of the county where the patient is found or located shall arrange for initial emergency transport of a patient to an emergency receiving facility. Except as otherwise authorized under subsection (b) of this Code section, the governing
authority of the county of the patient’s residence shall arrange for all required transportation for mental health purposes subsequent to the initial transport. The type of vehicle employed shall be in the discretion of the governing
authority of the county, provided that, whenever possible, marked vehicles normally used for the transportation of criminals or those accused of crimes shall not be used for the transportation of patients. The court shall, upon
the request of the community mental health center, order the sheriff to transport the patient in such manner as the patient’s condition demands. At any time the community mental health center is satisfied that the patient can be
transported safely by family members or friends, such private transportation shall be encouraged and authorized. In nonemergency situations, no female patient shall be transported at any time without another female in attendance
who is not a patient, unless such female patient is accompanied by her husband, father, adult brother, or adult son.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, when a patient is under the care of a facility, the facility shall have the discretion to determine the type of vehicle to safely transport the patient and to arrange for such transportation
without the need to obtain the prior approval of the governing authority of the county of the patient’s residence, the court, or the community mental health center. This subsection shall not prevent the facility from requesting
and receiving transportation services from the governing authority of the county of the patient’s residence and shall not relieve the county sheriff of the duty of providing transportation. Persons providing transportation are
authorized to transport a patient from a sending facility to a receiving facility but shall not release the patient under any circumstances except into the custody of the receiving facility. The use of physical restraints to ensure
the safe transport of the patient shall comply with the requirements of Code Section 37-3-165. When transportation is not provided by the county sheriff, the expense of such transportation shall not be billed to the county governing
authority but may be billed to the patient and, unless agreed to in writing by the facility, shall not be billed to or considered an obligation of the facility.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) or (b) of this Code section, for initial transports to an emergency receiving facility initiated by a peace officer pursuant to Code Section 37-3-42, the emergency receiving facility shall coordinate all subsequent transports
with the law enforcement agency employing such peace officer or a qualified private nonemergency transport provider or ambulance service.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, § 8; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 8; Code 1933, § 88-508, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.14, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-502.17, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p.
1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1067, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 3-4/HB 1013.

The 2022 amendment,
effective July 1, 2022, added subsection (c).

Cross references.

Manner of marking of law enforcement and emergency vehicles, §

40-8-90

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-3-102.
Transfer of patients to custody of federal agencies for diagnosis, care, or treatment; retention of jurisdiction by Georgia courts; jurisdiction in federal hospitals and institutions located in Georgia.

If a patient ordered to be hospitalized pursuant to this chapter is eligible for hospital care or treatment by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency, the department shall transfer the patient to the custody of the
nearest such agency with available bed space for diagnosis, care, or treatment. When any such patient is admitted under this Code section to any such hospital or institution within or outside the state, he shall be subject to the
rules and regulations of such agency. Upon notification from the superintendent or the chief medical officer of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Center for those patients therein who may require involuntary
treatment pursuant to this chapter, the patient will be evaluated, while remaining in the physical custody of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs Medical Center, by the nearest emergency receiving facility. The superintendent
and chief medical officer of any hospital or institution operated by such agency in which the individual is so hospitalized shall, with respect to such individual, be vested with the same powers and duties as the superintendent
and chief medical officer of facilities within this state with respect to all matters under this chapter. Jurisdiction is retained in the appropriate courts of this state at any time to inquire into the mental condition of an individual
so hospitalized to determine the necessity for continuance of his hospitalization and to order his release; and every transfer of a patient by the department pursuant to this Code section is so conditioned.

An order of a court of competent jurisdiction of another state, territory, or possession or of the District of Columbia authorizing hospitalization of a patient by any agency of the United States shall have the same force and effect as to the patient
while in this state as in the jurisdiction in which is situated the court entering the order; and the courts of the state, territory, possession, or district issuing such order shall be deemed to have retained jurisdiction of the
patient so hospitalized for the purpose of inquiring into his mental condition and determining the necessity for continuance of his hospitalization, as is provided in subsection (a) of this Code section with respect to patients
ordered hospitalized by the courts of this state. Consent is given for the application of the law of the state, territory, possession, or district in which is located the court issuing the order for hospitalization with respect
to the authority of the chief medical officer of any hospital or institution operated in this state by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency to retain custody, transfer, furlough, or discharge
the patient therein hospitalized.

History.
Ga. L. 1958, p. 697, §§ 7, 10; Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, §§ 7, 10; Code 1933, §§ 88-507, 88-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-508.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-507.4, enacted
by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 756, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 45, § 1.

37-3-103.
Procedure for transfer of Georgia residents from out-of-state hospitals to Georgia hospitals.

Upon application to the department by a parent, spouse, next of kin, or guardian or by an agency of another state in which the patient is hospitalized, a patient shall be eligible to be hospitalized in the State of Georgia if found by the department to
be a legal resident of this state. The department shall designate a hospital to which such patient is to be transported at no expense to the State of Georgia. The regional state hospital administrator of such hospital and the next
of kin or guardian of the patient shall be notified of this action. The chief medical officer shall be authorized to hospitalize the patient for a period not to exceed five days unless prior to the expiration of such period the patient
shall have voluntarily agreed to hospitalization or involuntary proceedings shall have been instituted under this chapter. After a thorough physical and mental examination has been made by the medical staff of such hospital, the chief
medical officer of the hospital or his designee is authorized to sign an application for involuntary hospitalization if necessary. Such application shall be forwarded to the court of the county in which that hospital is located for
action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter relative thereto.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-524, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 837, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-507.8, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18.

37-3-104.
Procedure upon discovery that a patient hospitalized in Georgia is not a resident.

If a hospitalized patient is discovered not to be a resident, the regional state hospital administrator of the treatment facility in which the patient is hospitalized shall seek his transfer to the custody of authorities of the state of his residence
or to a publicly owned or publicly operated psychiatric hospital in that state. Notwithstanding an individual’s status as a nonresident, nothing contained in this Code section shall prevent the voluntary hospitalization of such individual
under this chapter for which due payment is made by such individual or others on his behalf nor shall it prevent the transfer, custody, care, or treatment of such individual in accordance with the terms of any reciprocal agreement
between the State of Georgia and any other state, the District of Columbia, or any territory or possession of the United States. This Code section shall not apply to persons confined to any facility operated by or under the control
of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other federal agency.

History.
Ga. L. 1960, p. 837, § 21; Code 1933, § 88-521, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-508.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 505, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-507.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1789, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p.
45, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-18.

Cross references.

Rights of citizens of other states while in Georgia generally, §

1-2-9

.